Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2502
Reciprocal state, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-2501 to 44-2504, reciprocal state shall mean any state the laws of which impose substantially similar restrictions upon an insurer organized under the laws of that state as are imposed upon domestic insurers by section 44-2501.

Laws 1973, LB 425, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 201.